Utah statutes.
77-36-2.3.   Law enforcement officer's training.

All training of law enforcement officers relating to domestic violence shall stress protection of the victim, enforcement of criminal laws in domestic situations, and the availability of community shelters, services, and resources.  Law enforcement agencies and community organizations with expertise in domestic violence shall cooperate in all aspects of that training.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 1995 General Session

